Wisconsin, session 2025, SB952.
do enact as follows:SB952,11Section 1. 16.02 of the statutes is created to read:SB952,2,3216.02 Government service delivery improvements. (1) Definitions. In 3this section: SB952,2,54(a) “Agency” means an office, department, or independent agency in the 5executive branch of state government.SB952,2,96(b) “Government service delivery” means an action by an agency, or by a 7contractor or nonprofit organization acting on behalf of the agency or administering 8an agency program, that is related to providing a benefit or service to a resident, 9business, or organization in this state.SB952,2,1110(c) “Government service delivery channel” means the format or medium of an 11interaction with an agency, including any of the following:SB952,2,12121. In person.SB952,2,13132. Through the mail.SB952,2,14143. Through a digital service.SB952,2,15154. By telephone.SB952,2,16165. Through a contact center.SB952,2,17176. On a website.SB952,3,117. Through outreach and communication.SB952,3,228. Through collaboration with a 3rd party.SB952,3,53(2) Duties of the secretary. (a) The secretary shall designate a 4government service delivery coordinator to coordinate efforts across agencies to 5improve government service delivery.SB952,3,86(b) The secretary shall, after consultation with an agency head, identify the 7agency’s programs that are determined to be high impact due to the scale and 8impact of the program’s public-facing services.SB952,3,119(3) Duties of government service delivery coordinator. The 10government service delivery coordinator designated under sub. (2) (a) shall do all of 11the following:SB952,3,1312(a) Facilitate and coordinate efforts to improve government service delivery 13across agencies, particularly with respect to high-impact service programs.SB952,3,1514(b) Serve as the coordinating official responsible for supporting government 15service delivery across agencies.SB952,3,1716(c) Advise the secretary on the government service delivery provided by 17agencies and efforts for improvement.SB952,3,2218(d) In consultation with each lead agency official designated under sub. (4) 19and other agency stakeholders, develop and oversee the implementation of 20government service delivery standards, policies, and guidelines for services and 21programs provided by agencies. The standards, policies, and guidelines shall, at a 22minimum, address all of the following topics:SB952,3,24231. Best practices for understanding the needs of an individual, business, or 24organization interacting with an agency.SB952,4,212. Best practices for soliciting and considering voluntary feedback provided by 2the public regarding government service delivery.SB952,4,333. Best practices for assessing government service delivery processes.SB952,4,644. Considerations in evaluating the factors of ease, efficiency, transparency, 5accessibility, fairness, burden, and duration, including wait and processing times, 6with respect to government service delivery.SB952,4,975. The use of commercial products and services to measure holistic 8government service delivery channels, customer experiences, and customer service 9satisfaction.SB952,4,1110(e) Coordinate the collection of qualitative and quantitative information and 11data on government service delivery.SB952,4,1512(f) Evaluate the quality of government service delivery, including through the 13establishment of performance metrics developed using the standards, policies, and 14guidelines developed pursuant to par. (d) and the information and data collected 15pursuant to par. (e).SB952,4,1716(g) Engage with stakeholders to identify leading practices in service design 17and delivery to improve government service delivery across and within agencies.SB952,4,2318(4) Duties of lead agency official. (a) The head of each agency shall 19designate a lead agency official to be responsible for the duties under par. (b) 20regarding the government service delivery of the agency. The individual designated 21shall possess sufficient operational authority to effectuate implementation of 22government service delivery improvements within the agency, particularly with 23respect to high impact service programs identified under sub. (2) (b).SB952,5,21(b) The duties of the lead agency official designated under par. (a) shall 2include all of the following:SB952,5,531. Coordinating, under the direction of the head of the agency and in 4collaboration with relevant agency officials, efforts to improve the agency’s 5government service delivery and government service delivery channels.SB952,5,862. Submitting, at the direction of the government service delivery coordinator, 7an implementation plan for improving agency government service delivery no later 8than one year from the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date].SB952,5,1193. Coordinating the agency’s collection of qualitative and quantitative 10information and data on government service delivery and efforts to use the data and 11information to improve the agency’s government service delivery.SB952,5,15124. Facilitating, in coordination with the government service delivery 13coordinator designated under sub. (2) (a), collaboration among offices and 14components within the agency, and across agencies, to improve and enhance 15government service delivery.SB952,5,18165. Assisting with incorporating the government service delivery requirements 17established under this section in agency plans, including strategic plans and 18annual performance plans.SB952,5,2219(4) Annual report. Annually, the secretary shall prepare a report on efforts 20to improve government service delivery by agencies during the prior fiscal year and 21submit the report to the governor and the chief clerk of each house of the legislature 22for distribution to the appropriate standing committees under s. 13.172 (3). SB952,5,2323